Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.310

Dissolution.

A board of commissioners of a metropolitan park district may, upon a majority vote of all its members, dissolve in its entirety any metropolitan park district, prorate the liabilities thereof, and turn over to the city and/or county so much of the district as is respectively located therein, when:

(1) Such city and/or county, through its governing officials, agrees to, and petitions for, such dissolution and the assumption of such assets and liabilities; or

(2) Ten percent of the voters of such city and/or county who voted at the last general election petition the governing officials for such a vote.

[ 2019 c 138 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.310. Prior: 1953 c 269 s 1.]

NOTES:

Dissolution of special districts: Chapters 36.96 and 53.48 RCW.